District of Columbia statutes.
16-3705

Failure of officer to obtain possession; procedure.

When the officer’s return of a writ of replevin issued pursuant to this subchapter is that he has served the defendant with copies of the complaint, affidavit, and summons, but that he could not obtain possession of the goods and chattels sued for, the plaintiff may prosecute the action for the value of the property and damages for detention, or he may renew the writ in order to obtain possession of the goods and chattels themselves.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 604, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Cross References

Attachment of property in replevin action, see § 16-517.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3705.
1973 Ed., § 16-3705.